Utah statutes.
17-52-404.   Amendment of optional plan.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), an optional plan, after going into effect
following an election held under Section 17-52-206, may be amended by an
affirmative vote of two-thirds of the county legislative body.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), an amendment to an optional plan in
effect may not take effect until approved by a majority of registered voters
voting in a general or special election at which the amendment is proposed, if
the amendment changes:
(a)  the size or makeup of the legislative body, except for adjustments
necessary due to decennial reapportionment;
(b)  the distribution of powers between the executive and legislative branches
of county government; or
(c)  the status of the county executive or legislative body from full-time to
part-time or vice versa.
